Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Part 2 Termination of Entities
4-29-239. Governmental entities terminated on June 30, 2018.

The following governmental entities shall terminate on June 30, 2018:

[Deleted by 2018 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-245.]

[Deleted by 2018 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-242.]

[Deleted by 2018 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-243.]

[Deleted by 2018 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-244.]

[Deleted by 2018 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-245.]

[Deleted by 2018 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-247.]

[Deleted by 2018 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-245.]

[Deleted by 2018 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-245.]

[Deleted by 2018 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-245.]

[Deleted by 2018 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-244.]

[Deleted by 2018 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-243.]

[Deleted by 2018 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-243.]

[Deleted by 2018 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-241.]

[Deleted by 2018 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-243.]

[Deleted by 2018 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-241.]

[Deleted by 2018 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-243.]

[Deleted by 2018 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-243.]

[Deleted by 2018 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-243.]

[Deleted by 2018 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-241.]

[Deleted by 2018 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-243.]

[Deleted by 2018 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-241.]

[Deleted by 2018 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-242.]

[Deleted by 2018 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-243.]

[Deleted by 2018 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-247.]

[Deleted by 2018 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-247.]

[Deleted by 2018 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-245.]

[Deleted by 2018 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-241.]

[Deleted by 2018 amendment.]

[Deleted by 2018 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-245.]

[Deleted by 2018 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-245.]

[Deleted by 2018 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-247.]

[Deleted by 2018 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-245.]

[Deleted by 2018 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-245.]

[Deleted by 2018 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-241.]

[Deleted by 2018 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-241.]

[Deleted by 2018 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-247.]

[Deleted by 2018 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-241.]

[Deleted by 2018 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-243.]

[Deleted by 2018 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-243.]

[Deleted by 2018 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-242.]

[Deleted by 2018 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-245.]

[Deleted by 2018 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-245.]

[Deleted by 2019 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-242.]

[Deleted by 2018 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-244.]

[Deleted by 2018 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-242.]

[Deleted by 2018 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-245.]

[Deleted by 2018 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-243.]

[Deleted by 2018 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-243.]

[Deleted by 2018 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-244.]

[Deleted by 2018 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-243.]

[Deleted by 2018 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-243.]

[Deleted by 2018 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-243.]

[Deleted by 2018 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-244.]

[Deleted by 2018 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-241.]

Each department, commission, board, agency or council of state government created during calendar year 2016 terminates on June 30, 2018.

Any governmental entity that has been terminated under this section may be continued, reestablished, or restructured in accordance with this chapter.

Acts 2013, ch. 8, § 2; 2013, ch. 9, § 2; 2013, ch. 10, § 2; 2013, ch. 17, § 2; 2013, ch. 19, § 2; 2013, ch. 24, § 2; 2013, ch. 25, § 2; 2013, ch. 26, § 2; 2013, ch. 27, § 2; 2013, ch. 28, § 2; 2013, ch. 29, § 2; 2013, ch. 30, § 2; 2013, ch. 54, § 2; 2013, ch. 78, § 2; 2013, ch. 132, § 2; 2013, ch. 289, § 105; 2014, ch. 492, § 2; 2014, ch. 493, § 2; 2014, ch. 494, § 2; 2014, ch. 511, § 2; 2014, ch. 542, § 2; 2014, ch. 552, § 2; 2014, ch. 564, § 2; 2014, ch. 572, § 2; 2014, ch. 602, § 2; 2014, ch. 609, § 2; 2014, ch. 655, § 2; 2014, ch. 657, § 2; 2014, ch. 664, § 2; 2014, ch. 666, § 2; 2014, ch. 668, § 2; 2014, ch. 725, § 2; 2014, ch. 726, § 2; 2014, ch. 727, § 2; 2014, ch. 728, § 2; 2014, ch. 774, § 2; 2014, ch. 775, § 2; 2014, ch. 778, § 2; 2014, ch. 779, § 2; 2014, ch. 801, § 2; 2014, ch. 858, § 2; 2015, ch. 10, § 2; 2015, ch. 11, § 2; 2015, ch. 16, § 2; 2015, ch. 24, § 7; 2015, ch. 63, § 2; 2015, ch. 341, § 16; 2016, ch. 546, § 2; 2016, ch. 548, § 2; 2016, ch. 561, § 2; 2016, ch. 761, § 2; 2016, ch. 762, § 2; 2016, ch. 773, § 2; 2016, ch. 909, § 2; 2016, ch. 1058, § 2; 2017, ch. 66, § 2; 2017, ch. 473, § 2; 2018, ch. 494, § 1; 2018, ch. 500, § 1; 2018, ch. 501, § 1; 2018, ch. 502, § 1; 2018, ch. 503, § 1; 2018, ch. 504, § 1; 2018, ch. 505, § 1; 2018, ch. 506, § 1; 2018, ch. 507, § 1; 2018, ch. 508, § 1; 2018, ch. 509, § 1; 2018, ch. 510, § 1; 2018, ch. 511, § 1; 2018, ch. 512, § 1; 2018, ch. 513, § 1; 2018, ch. 514, § 1; 2018, ch. 515, § 1; 2018, ch. 516, § 1; 2018, ch. 517, § 1; 2018, ch. 518, § 1; 2018, ch. 519, § 1; 2018, ch. 520, § 1; 2018, ch. 521, § 1; 2018, ch. 522, § 1; 2018, ch. 524, § 1; 2018, ch. 530, § 1; 2018, ch. 531, § 1; 2018, ch. 532, § 1; 2018, ch. 533, § 1; 2018, ch. 534, § 1; 2018, ch. 563, § 1; 2018, ch. 564, § 1; 2018, ch. 565, § 1; 2018, ch. 566, § 1; 2018, ch. 567, § 1; 2018, ch. 594, § 1; 2018, ch. 653, § 1; 2018, ch. 701, § 1; 2018, ch. 702, § 1; 2018, ch. 703, § 1; 2018, ch. 704, § 1; 2018, ch. 705, § 1; 2018, ch. 706, § 1; 2018, ch. 802, § 1; 2018, ch. 805, § 1; 2018, ch. 831, § 1; 2018, ch. 832, § 1; 2018, ch. 839, § 4; 2018, ch. 927, § 1; 2018, ch. 987, § 1; 2018, ch. 988, § 1; 2018, ch. 1034, § 1; 2018, ch. 1035, § 1; 2018, ch. 1043, § 1; 2019, ch. 406, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2013, ch. 289, § 103 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall be known and may be cited as the “Workers' Compensation Reform Act of 2013.”

Acts 2015, ch. 24, § 7 provided that the Tennessee Code Commission is requested to change references in Tennessee Code Annotated, as volumes are replaced and supplements are issued, from “veterans’ affairs” and “veterans affairs” to “veterans services” wherever the language appears in reference to the name or commissioner of the Tennessee department of veterans services.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 4 purported to amend this section by deleting the provisions of (a) concerning the Tennessee board of water quality, oil, and gas, created by §69-3-104; however, the 2018 amendment by ch. 704, already deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the Tennessee board of water quality, oil, and gas, created by §69-3-104, which were transferred to §4-29-244 by Acts 2018, ch. 704, § 2, effective April 12, 2018.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment by ch. 10 added “medical advisory committee, created by §50-6-135;” in (a).

The 2015 amendment by ch. 11 added “medical payment committee, created by §50-6-125;” in (a).

The 2015 amendment by ch. 16 added “board of parole, created by §40-28-103;” in (a).

The 2015 amendment by ch. 24 substituted “veterans services” for “veteran's affairs” in (a)(16).

The 2015 amendment by ch. 63 added “department of correction, created by §§4-3-101 and4-3-601;” in (a).

The 2015 amendment by ch. 341 substituted “bureau of workers' compensation” for “division of workers' compensation” in (a)(4).

The 2016 amendment, by ch. 546 added “controlled substance database advisory committee, created by §53-10-303;” in (a), which was transferred from §4-29-237 by Acts 2016, ch. 546, § 1, effective March 2, 2016.

The 2016 amendment, by ch. 548 added “Doe Mountain recreation authority, created by §11-25-103;” in (a), which was transferred from §4-29-237 by Acts 2016, ch. 548, § 1, effective March 2, 2016.

The 2016 amendment, by ch. 561 added “state board of cosmetology and barber examiners, created by §§62-3-101 and62-4-103;” in (a), which was transferred from §4-29-237 by Acts 2016, ch. 561, § 1, effective March 2, 2016.

The 2016 amendment by ch. 761 added “regional transportation authority of Middle Tennessee, created by §64-8-101” in (a), which was transferred from §4-29-237 by Acts 2016, ch. 761, § 1, effective April 19, 2016.

The 2016 amendment by ch. 762 added “Tennessee rehabilitative initiative in correction board, created by §41-22-404;” in (a), which was transferred from §4-29-237 by Acts 2016, ch. 762, § 1, effective April 19, 2016.

The 2016 amendment by ch. 773 added “board of pharmacy, created by §63-10-301;” in (a), which was transferred from §4-29-237 by Acts 2016, ch. 773, § 1, effective April 12, 2016.

The 2016 amendment by ch. 909 rewrote the former sunset provisions in (a) concerning the agency created by §64-5-101 which read: “Four Lake regional industrial developmental authority, created by §64-5-101;”; that agency is now called “Tennessee central economic authority”.

The 2016 amendment by ch. 1058 added “dyslexia advisory council, created by §49-1-229;” in (a).

The 2017 amendment by ch. 66 added “statewide community services agency, created by §37-5-305;” in (a), which was transferred from §4-29-238 by Acts 2017, ch. 66, § 2, effective March 31, 2017.

The 2017 amendment by ch. 473 added “health services and development agency, created by § 68-11-1604;” in (a), which was transferred from §4-29-239 by Acts 2017, ch. 473, § 2, effective June 6, 2017.

The 2018 amendment by ch. 494 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the Tennessee fish and wildlife commission, created by §70-1-201, which were transferred to §4-29-243 by Acts 2018, ch. 494, § 2, effective February 15, 2018.

The 2018 amendment by ch. 500 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the board of funeral directors and embalmers, created by §62-5-201, which were transferred to §4-29-245 by Acts 2018, ch. 500, § 2, effective February 22, 2018.

The 2018 amendment by ch. 501 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the collateral pool board, created by §9-4-506, which were transferred to §4-29-247 by Acts 2018, ch. 501, § 2, effective February 22, 2018.

The 2018 amendment by ch. 502 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the commission for uniform legislation, created by §4-9-101, which were transferred to §4-29-245 by Acts 2018, ch. 502, § 2, effective February 22, 2018.

The 2018 amendment by ch. 503 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the compact for education, created by §49-12-201, which were transferred to §4-29-245 by Acts 2018, ch. 503, § 2, effective February 22, 2018.

The 2018 amendment by ch. 504 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the controlled substance database advisory committee, created by §53-10-303, which were transferred to §4-29-244 by Acts 2018, ch. 504, § 2, effective February 22, 2018.

The 2018 amendment by ch. 505 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the council on children’s mental health care, created by §37-3-111, which were transferred to §4-29-243 by Acts 2018, ch. 505, § 2, effective February 22, 2018.

The 2018 amendment by ch. 506 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the Doe Mountain recreation authority, created by §11-25-103, which were transferred to §4-29-241 by Acts 2018, ch. 506, § 2, effective February 22, 2018.

The 2018 amendment by ch. 507 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the domestic violence state coordinating council, created by §38-12-101, which were transferred to §4-29-243 by Acts 2018, ch. 507, § 2, effective February 22, 2018.

The 2018 amendment by ch. 508 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the housing development agency, board of directors, created by §13-23-104, which were transferred to §4-29-243 by Acts 2018, ch. 508, § 2, effective February 22, 2018.

The 2018 amendment by ch. 509 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the interstate compact for juveniles, created by §37-4-101, which were transferred to §4-29-247 by Acts 2018, ch. 509, § 2, effective February 22, 2018.

The 2018 amendment by ch. 510 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the interstate compact for supervision of adult offenders, created by §40-28-401, which were transferred to §4-29-247 by Acts 2018, ch. 510, § 2, effective February 22, 2018.

The 2018 amendment by ch. 511 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the interstate mining compact, created by §59-10-101, which were transferred to §4-29-245 by Acts 2018, ch. 511, § 2, effective February 22, 2018.

The 2018 amendment by ch. 512 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the interstate nurse licensure compact, created by §63-7-401, which were transferred to §4-29-241 by Acts 2018, ch. 512, § 2, effective February 22, 2018.

The 2018 amendment by ch. 513 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the medical advisory committee, created by §50-6-135, which were transferred to §4-29-245 by Acts 2018, ch. 513, § 2, effective February 22, 2018.

The 2018 amendment by ch. 514 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the medical payment committee, created by §50-6-125, which were transferred to §4-29-245 by Acts 2018, ch. 514, § 2, effective February 22, 2018.

The 2018 amendment by ch. 515 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the post-conviction defender oversight commission, created by §40-30-203, which were transferred to §4-29-247 by Acts 2018, ch. 515, § 2, effective February 22, 2018.

The 2018 amendment by ch. 516 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the private investigation and polygraph commission, created by §62-26-301, which were transferred to §4-29-245 by Acts 2018, ch. 516, § 2, effective February 22, 2018.

The 2018 amendment by ch. 517 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the sex offender treatment board, created by §39-13-704, which were transferred to §4-29-247 by Acts 2018, ch. 517 § 2, effective February 22, 2018.

The 2018 amendment by ch. 518 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the statewide community services agency, created by §37-5-305, which were transferred to §4-29-242 by Acts 2018, ch. 518, § 2, effective February 22, 2018.

The 2018 amendment by ch. 519 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the Tennessee board of court reporting, created by §20-9-604, which were transferred to §4-29-245 by Acts 2018, ch. 519, § 2, effective February 22, 2018.

The 2018 amendment by ch. 520 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the Tennessee central economic authority, created by §64-5-101, which were transferred to §4-29-245 by Acts 2018, ch. 520, § 2, effective February 22, 2018.

The 2018 amendment by ch. 521 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the Tennessee heritage conservation trust fund board of trustees, created by §11-7-104, which were transferred to §4-29-244 by Acts 2018, ch. 521, effective February 22, 2018.

The 2018 amendment by ch. 522 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the underground storage tanks and solid waste disposal control board, created by §68-211-111, which were transferred to §4-29-244 by Acts 2018, ch. 522, § 2, effective February 22, 2018.

The 2018 amendment by ch. 524 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the soil scientist advisory committee, created by §62-18-210, which were transferred to §4-29-241 by Acts 2018, ch. 502, § 2, effective March 5, 2018.

The 2018 amendment by ch. 530 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the board of nursing, created by §63-7-201, which were transferred to §4-29-242 by Acts 2018, ch. 530, § 2, effective March 7, 2018.

The 2018 amendment by ch. 531 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the board of pharmacy, created by §63-10-301, which were transferred to §4-29-244 by Acts 2018, ch. 531, § 2, effective March 7, 2018.

The 2018 amendment by ch. 532 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the collection service board, created by §62-20-104, which were transferred to §4-29-245 by Acts 2018, ch. 532, § 2, effective March 7, 2018.

The 2018 amendment by ch. 533 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the real estate appraiser commission, created by §62-39-201, which were transferred to §4-29-245 by Acts 2018, ch. 533, § 1, effective March 7, 2018.

The 2018 amendment by ch. 534 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the Tennessee auctioneer commission, created by §62-19-104, which were transferred to §4-29-245 by Acts 2018, ch. 534, § 1, effective March 7, 2018.

The 2018 amendment by ch. 563 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the bureau of workers’ compensation, created by §4-3-1408, which were transferred to §4-29-245 by Acts 2018, ch. 563, § 2, effective March 16, 2018.

The 2018 amendment by ch. 564 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the department of agriculture, created by §§4-3-101 and4-3-201, which were transferred to §4-29-243 by Acts 2018, ch. 564, § 2, effective March 16, 2018.

The 2018 amendment by ch. 565 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the department of human services, created by §§4-3-101 and4-3-1201, which were transferred to §4-29-243 by Acts 2018, ch. 565, § 2, effective March 16, 2018.

The 2018 amendment by ch. 566 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the department of tourist development, created by §§4-3-101 and4-3-2201; which were transferred to §4-29-243 by Acts 2018, ch. 566, § 2, effective March 16, 2018.

The 2018 amendment by ch. 567 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the department of veterans services, created by §§4-3-101 and4-3-2501, which were transferred to §4-29-243 by Acts 2018, ch. 567, § 2, effective March 16, 2018.

The 2018 amendment by ch. 594 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the dyslexia advisory council, created by §49-1-229, which were transferred to §4-29-241 by Acts 2018, ch. 594, § 2, effective March 22, 2018.

The 2018 amendment by ch. 653 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the Tennessee bureau of investigation, created by §38-6-101, which were transferred to §4-29-242 by Acts 2018, ch. 653, § 2, effective April 9, 2018.

The 2018 amendment by ch. 701 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the department of revenue, created by §§ 4-3-101 and4-3-1901, which were transferred to §4-29-243 by Acts 2018, ch. 701, § 2, effective April 12, 2018.

The 2018 amendment by ch. 702 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the health services and development agency, created by §68-11-1604 , which were transferred to §4-29-242 by Acts 2018, ch. 702, § 2, effective April 12, 2018.

The 2018 amendment by ch. 703 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the state university and community college system, board of regents, created by §49-8-201, which were transferred to §4-29-243 by Acts 2018, ch. 703, § 2, effective April 12, 2018.

The 2018 amendment by ch. 704 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the Tennessee board of water quality, oil, and gas, created by §69-3-104, which were transferred to §4-29-244 by Acts 2018, ch. 704, § 2, effective April 12, 2018.

The 2018 amendment by ch. 705 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the Tennessee higher education commission, created by §49-7-201, which were transferred to §4-29-243 by Acts 2018, ch. 705, § 2 effective April 12, 2018.

The 2018 amendment by ch. 706 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the Tennessee student assistance corporation, board of directors, created by §49-4-202, which were transferred to §4-29-243 by Acts 2018, ch. 706, § 2 effective April 12, 2018.

The 2018 amendment by ch. 802 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the state board of cosmetology and barber examiners, created by §§62-3-101 and62-4-103, which were transferred to §4-29-243 by Acts 2018, ch. 802, § 2, effective April 24, 2018.

The 2018 amendment by ch. 805 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the investment advisory council, created by §8-27-108, which was terminated by Acts 2018, ch. 805, § 3, effective April 24, 2018.

The 2018 amendment by ch. 831 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the board of parole created by §40-28-103, which were transferred to §4-29-243 by Acts 2018, ch. 831, § 2 effective April 27, 2018.

The 2018 amendment by ch. 832 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the Tennessee rehabilitative initiative in correction board, created by § 41-22-404, which were transferred to §4-29-243 by Acts 2018, ch. 832, § 2 effective April 27, 2018.

The 2018 amendment by ch. 927 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the Tennessee film, entertainment and music commission, created by §4-3-5003, which were transferred to §4-29-243 by Acts 2018, ch. 927, § 2 effective May 15, 2018.

The 2018 amendment by ch. 987 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the department of correction, created by §§4-3-101 and4-3-601, which were transferred to §4-29-241 by Acts 2018, ch. 987, § 2 effective May 21, 2018.

The 2018 amendment by ch. 988 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the real estate commission, created by §62-13-201, which were transferred to §4-29-241 by Acts 2018, ch. 988, § 2 effective May 21, 2018.

The 2018 amendment by ch. 1034 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the department of intellectual and developmental disabilities, created by §§4-3-101 and4-3-2701, which were transferred to §4-29-241 by Acts 2018, ch. 1034, § 2 effective May 21, 2018.

The 2018 amendment by ch. 1035 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the regional transportation authority of Middle Tennessee, created by §64-8-101, which were transferred to §4-29-241 by Acts 2018, ch. 1035, § 2 effective May 21, 2018.

The 2018 amendment by ch. 1043 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the University of Tennessee, board of trustees, created by §49-9-202, which were transferred to §4-29-241 by Acts 2018, ch. 1043, § 2 effective May 21, 2018.

The 2019 amendment by ch. 406 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the Tennessee board of judicial conduct, which were transferred to §4-29-242 by Acts 2019, ch. 406, § 2, effective May 21, 2019.

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 10, § 3. March 19, 2015.

Acts 2015, ch. 11, § 3. March 19, 2015.

Acts 2015, ch. 16, § 4. March 27, 2015.

Acts 2015, ch. 24, § 9. July 1, 2015.

Acts 2015, ch. 63, § 4. April 6, 2015.

Acts 2015, ch. 341, § 19. May 4, 2015.

Acts 2016, ch. 546, § 4. March 2, 2016.

Acts 2016, ch. 548, § 3. March 2, 2016.

Acts 2016, ch. 561, § 4. March 2, 2016.

Acts 2016, ch. 761, § 4. April 19, 2016.

Acts 2016, ch. 762, § 7. April 19, 2016.

Acts 2016, ch. 773, § 4. April 12, 2016.

Acts 2016, ch. 909, § 4. July 1, 2016.

Acts 2016, ch. 1058, § 3. July 1, 2016; provided, that for purposes of appointing members to the dyslexia advisory council, the act shall take effect on April 28, 2016.

Acts 2017, ch. 66, § 4. March 31, 2017.

Acts 2017, ch. 473, § 4. June 6, 2017.

Acts 2018, ch. 494, § 3. February 15, 2018.

Acts 2018, ch. 500, § 3. February 22, 2018.

Acts 2018, ch. 501, § 3. February 22, 2018.

Acts 2018, ch. 502, § 3. February 22, 2018.

Acts 2018, ch. 503, § 3. February 22, 2018.

Acts 2018, ch. 504, § 3. February 22, 2018.

Acts 2018, ch. 505, § 3. February 22, 2018.

Acts 2018, ch. 506, § 3. February 22, 2018.

Acts 2018, ch. 507, § 3. February 22, 2018.

Acts 2018, ch. 508, § 3. February 22, 2018.

Acts 2018, ch. 509, § 3. February 22, 2018.

Acts 2018, ch. 510, § 3. February 22, 2018.

Acts 2018, ch. 511, § 3. February 22, 2018.

Acts 2018, ch. 512, § 3. February 22, 2018.

Acts 2018, ch. 513, § 3. February 22, 2018.

Acts 2018, ch. 514, § 3. February 22, 2018.

Acts 2018, ch. 515, § 3. February 22, 2018.

Acts 2018, ch. 516, § 3. February 22, 2018.

Acts 2018, ch. 517, § 3. February 22, 2018.

Acts 2018, ch. 518, § 3. February 22, 2018.

Acts 2018, ch. 519, § 3. February 22, 2018.

Acts 2018, ch. 520, § 3. February 22, 2018.

Acts 2018, ch. 521, § 3. February 22, 2018.

Acts 2018, ch. 522, § 3. February 22, 2018.

Acts 2018, ch. 524, § 3. March 5, 2018.

Acts 2018, ch. 530, § 3. March 7, 2018.

Acts 2018, ch. 531, § 3. March 7, 2018.

Acts 2018, ch. 532, § 3. March 7, 2018.

Acts 2018, ch. 533, § 3. March 7, 2018.

Acts 2018, ch. 534, § 3. March 7, 2018.

Acts 2018, ch. 563, § 3. March 16, 2018.

Acts 2018, ch. 564, § 3. March 16, 2018.

Acts 2018, ch. 565, § 3. March 16, 2018.

Acts 2018, ch. 566, § 3. March 16, 2018.

Acts 2018, ch. 567, § 3. March 16, 2018.

Acts 2018, ch. 594, § 4. March 22, 2018.

Acts 2018, ch. 653, § 4. April 9, 2018.

Acts 2018, ch. 701, § 3. April 12, 2018.

Acts 2018, ch. 702, § 3. April 12, 2018.

Acts 2018, ch. 703, § 4. April 12, 2018.

Acts 2018, ch. 704, § 3. April 12, 2018.

Acts 2018, ch. 705, § 3. April 12, 2018.

Acts 2018, ch. 706, § 3. April 12, 2018.

Acts 2018, ch. 802 § 3. April 24, 2018.

Acts 2018, ch. 805, § 4. April 24, 2018.

Acts 2018, ch. 831, § 3. April 27, 2018.

Acts 2018, ch. 832, § 3. April 27, 2018.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 47. [See Compiler's Notes.]

Acts 2018, ch. 927, § 3. May 15, 2018.

Acts 2018, ch. 987, § 4. May 21, 2018.

Acts 2018, ch. 988, § 3. May 21, 2018.

Acts 2018, ch. 1034, § 4. May 21, 2018.

Acts 2018, ch. 1035, § 4. May 21, 2018.

Acts 2018, ch. 1043, § 3. May 21, 2018.

Acts 2019, ch. 406, § 3. May 21, 2019.

4-29-240. Governmental entities terminated on June 30, 2019.

The following governmental entities shall terminate on June 30, 2019:

[Deleted by 2019 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-246.]

[Deleted by 2019 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-246.]

[Deleted by 2019 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-244.]

[Deleted by 2019 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-246.]

[Deleted by 2019 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-244.]

[Deleted by 2019 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-244.]

[Deleted by 2019 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-246.]

[Deleted by 2019 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-246.]

[Deleted by 2019 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-246.]

[Deleted by 2019 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-246.]

[Deleted by 2019 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-246.]

[Deleted by 2019 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-244.]

[Deleted by 2019 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-243.]

[Deleted by 2019 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-248.]

[Deleted by 2019 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-245.]

[Deleted by 2019 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-246.]

[Deleted by 2019 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-244.]

[Deleted by 2019 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-243.]

[Deleted by 2019 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-244.]

[Deleted by 2019 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-244.]

[Deleted by 2019 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-244.]

[Deleted by 2019 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-241.]

[Deleted by 2019 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-244.]

[Deleted by 2019 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-244.]

[Deleted by 2019 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-244.]

[Deleted by 2019 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-246.]

[Deleted by 2019 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-246.]

[Deleted by 2019 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-246.]

[Deleted by 2019 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-246.]

[Deleted by 2019 amendment.]

[Deleted by 2019 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-242.]

[Deleted by 2019 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-246.]

[Deleted by 2019 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-244.]

[Deleted by 2019 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-242.]

[Deleted by 2019 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-244.]

[Deleted by 2019 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-248.]

[Deleted by 2019 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-248.]

[Deleted by 2019 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-245.]

[Deleted by 2019 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-246.]

[Deleted by 2019 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-245.]

[Deleted by 2019 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-241.]

[Deleted by 2018 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-241.]

[Deleted by 2019 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-244.]

[Deleted by 2019 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-248.]

[Deleted by 2019 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-246.]

[Deleted by 2019 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-244.]

[Deleted by 2019 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-242.]

[Deleted by 2019 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-246.]

[Deleted by 2019 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-246.]

[Deleted by 2019 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-246.]

[Deleted by 2019 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-244.]

[Deleted by 2019 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-246.]

[Deleted by 2019 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-246.]

[Deleted by 2019 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-245.]

[Deleted by 2019 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-244.]

[Repealed by 2019 amendment.]

[Deleted by 2019 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-246.]

Each department, commission, board, agency, or council of state government created during calendar year 2017 terminates on June 30, 2019.

Any governmental entity that has been terminated under this section may be continued, reestablished or restructured in accordance with this chapter.

Acts 2013, ch. 6, § 2; 2013, ch. 7, § 2; 2013, ch. 11, § 2; 2013, ch. 12, § 2; 2013, ch. 14, § 2; 2013, ch. 53, § 2; 2013, ch. 77, § 2; 2013, ch. 80, § 2; 2013, ch. 129, § 2; 2013, ch. 331, § 2; 2014, ch. 491, § 2; 2014, ch. 497, § 2; 2014, ch. 513, § 2; 2014, ch. 543, § 2; 2014, ch. 566, § 2; 2014, ch. 600, § 2; 2014, ch. 603, § 2; 2014, ch. 607, § 2; 2015, ch. 2, § 2; 2015, ch. 3, § 2; 2015, ch. 4, § 2; 2015, ch. 6, § 2; 2015, ch. 7, § 2; 2015, ch. 8, § 2; 2015, ch. 9, § 2; 2015, ch. 12, § 2; 2015, ch. 17, § 2; 2015, ch. 18, § 2; 2015, ch. 31, § 2; 2015, ch. 32, § 2; 2015, ch. 35, § 2; 2015, ch. 37, § 2; 2015, ch. 62, § 2; 2015, ch. 64, § 2; 2015, ch. 86, § 2; 2015, ch. 90, § 2; 2015, ch. 128, § 2; 2015, ch. 129, § 2; 2015, ch. 191, § 2; 2015, ch. 204, § 2; 2015, ch. 205, § 2; 2015, ch. 206, § 2; 2015, ch. 229, § 2; 2015, ch. 385, § 2; 2015, ch. 418, § 2; 2016, ch. 537, § 2; 2016, ch. 550, § 2; 2016, ch. 774, § 2; 2017, ch. 78, § 2; 2017, ch. 86, § 4; 2017, ch. 117, § 2; 2017, ch. 320, § 2; 2017, ch. 322, § 2; 2017, ch. 400, § 1; 2017, ch. 434, § 2; 2017, ch. 444, § 2; 2017, ch. 458, § 1; 2018, ch. 707, § 1; 2018, ch. 711, § 1; 2019, ch. 14, § 1; 2019, ch. 15, § 1; 2019, ch. 16, § 1; 2019, ch. 17, § 1; 2019, ch. 18, § 1; 2019, ch. 19, § 1; 2019, ch. 20, § 1; 2019, ch. 21, § 1; 2019, ch. 22, § 1; 2019, ch. 23, § 1; 2019, ch. 24, § 1; 2019, ch. 25, § 1; 2019, ch. 26, § 1; 2019, ch. 27, § 1; 2019, ch. 28, § 1; 2019, ch. 29, § 1; 2019, ch. 30, § 1; 2019, ch. 31, § 1; 2019, ch. 32, § 1; 2019, ch. 33, § 1; 2019, ch. 34, § 1; 2019, ch. 43, § 1; 2019, ch. 46, § 1; 2019, ch. 47, § 1; 2019, ch. 48, § 1; 2019, ch. 49, § 1; 2019, ch. 50, § 1; 2019, ch. 51, § 1; 2019, ch. 52, § 1; 2019, ch. 53, § 1; 2019, ch. 54, § 1; 2019, ch. 55, § 1; 2019, ch. 56, § 1; 2019, ch. 57, § 1; 2019, ch. 58, § 1; 2019, ch. 113, § 1; 2019, ch. 114, § 1; 2019, ch. 115, § 1; 2019, ch. 166, § 1; 2019, ch. 212, § 1; 2019, ch. 285, § 1; 2019, ch. 286, § 1; 2019, ch. 287, § 1; 2019, ch. 288, § 1; 2019, ch. 289, § 1; 2019, ch. 290, § 1; 2019, ch. 291, § 1; 2019, ch. 292, § 1; 2019, ch. 293, § 1; 2019, ch. 294, § 1; 2019, ch. 295, § 1; 2019, ch. 296, § 1; 2019, ch. 297, § 1; 2019, ch. 298, § 1; 2019, ch. 299, § 1; 2019, ch. 333, § 1; 2019, ch. 334, § 1; 2019, ch. 336, § 1; 2019, ch. 368, § 1; 2019, ch. 369, § 1; 2019, ch. 444, § 1; 2019, ch. 493, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2015, ch. 31, § 3 provides that the Bureau of TennCare shall appear before the Government Operations Joint Evaluation Committee on Judiciary and Government no later than September 20, 2015, to update the Committee on the Bureau’s progress in addressing the findings set forth in the December 2014 performance audit report.

For the Preamble to the act concerning the encouragement of economic growth and to support recreational releases on the Ocoee River, please refer to Acts 2017, ch. 434.

For the Preamble to the act concerning the creation of the Tennessee energy policy council, please refer to Acts 2017, ch. 458.

4-29-241. Governmental entities terminated on June 30, 2020.

The following governmental entities shall terminate on June 30, 2020:

[Deleted by 2020 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-248.]

[Deleted by 2020 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-245.]

[Deleted by 2020 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-242.]

[Deleted by 2020 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-249.]

[Deleted by 2020 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-244.]

[Deleted by 2020 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-247.]

[Deleted by 2020 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-249.]

[Deleted by 2020 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-244.]

[Deleted by 2020 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-247.]

[Deleted by 2020 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-249.]

[Deleted by 2020 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-246.]

[Deleted by 2020 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-246.]

[Deleted by 2020 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-245.]

[Deleted by 2020 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-247.]

[Deleted by 2020 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-245.]

[Deleted by 2020 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-245.]

[Deleted by 2020 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-245.]

[Deleted by 2020 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-244.]

[Deleted by 2020 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-245.]

[Deleted by 2020 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-244.]

[Deleted by 2020 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-245.]

[Deleted by 2020 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-244.]

[Deleted by 2020 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-246.]

[Deleted by 2020 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-248.]

[Deleted by 2020 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-246.]

[Deleted by 2020 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-246.]

[Deleted by 2020 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-247.]

[Deleted by 2020 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-246.]

[Deleted by 2020 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-249.]

[Deleted by 2020 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-247.]

[Deleted by 2020 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-247.]

[Deleted by 2020 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-243.]

[Deleted by 2020 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-247.]

[Terminated by 2020 amendment.]

[Deleted by 2020 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-249.]

Polysomnography professional standards committee, created by § 63-31-103;

[Deleted by 2020 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-249.]

[Deleted by 2020 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-245.]

[Deleted by 2020 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-242.]

[Deleted by 2020 amendment.]

[Deleted by 2020 amendment.]

[Deleted by 2020 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-249.]

[Deleted by 2020 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-248.]

State board for licensing alarm systems contractors, created by § 62-32-306;

[Deleted by 2020 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-247.]

[Deleted by 2020 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-247.]

[Deleted by 2020 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-247.]

[Deleted by 2020 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-247.]

[Deleted by 2020 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-245.]

[Deleted by 2020 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-247.]

[Deleted by 2020 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-248.]

[Deleted by 2020 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-245.]

[Deleted by 2020 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-245.]

[Deleted by 2019 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-242.]

[Deleted by 2020 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-242.]

[Deleted by 2016 amendment, commission terminated.]

[Deleted by 2020 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-243.]

[Deleted by 2020 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-247.]

[Deleted by 2020 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-245.]

[Deleted by 2020 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-248.]

[Deleted by 2020 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-249.]

[Deleted by 2020 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-246.]

[Deleted by 2020 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-247.]

Tennessee radiologic imaging and radiation therapy board of examiners, created by § 63-6-901;

[Deleted by 2020 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-249.]

[Deleted by 2020 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-245.]

[Deleted by 2020 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-247.]

[Deleted by 2020 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-243.]

[Deleted by 2020 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-249.]

Each department, commission, board, agency or council of state government created during calendar year 2018 terminates on June 30, 2020.

Any governmental entity that has been terminated under this section may be continued, reestablished or restructured in accordance with this chapter.

Acts 2014, ch. 490, § 2; 2014, ch. 496, § 2; 2014, ch. 510, § 2; 2014, ch. 516, § 2; 2014, ch. 517, § 2; 2014, ch. 518, § 2; 2014, ch. 519, § 2; 2014, ch. 520, § 2; 2014, ch. 526, § 2; 2014, ch. 541, § 2; 2014, ch. 580, § 2; 2014, ch. 601 § 2; 2014, ch. 604 § 2; 2014, ch. 605 § 2; 2014, ch. 606 § 2; 2014, ch. 608 § 2; 2014, ch. 665, § 2; 2015, ch. 1, § 2; 2015, ch. 5, § 2; 2015, ch. 13, § 2; 2015, ch. 36, § 2; 2015, ch. 66, § 2; 2015, ch. 144, § 2; 2015, ch. 145, § 2; 2015, ch. 146, § 2; 2015, ch. 259, § 2; 2016, ch. 540, § 2; 2016, ch. 544, § 2; 2016, ch. 545, § 2; 2016, ch. 549, § 2; 2016, ch. 556, § 2; 2016, ch. 560, § 2; 2016, ch. 564, § 2; 2016, ch. 608, § 2; 2016, ch. 610, § 2; 2016, ch. 614, § 2; 2016, ch. 619, § 1; 2016, ch. 639, § 2; 2016, ch. 776, § 2; 2016, ch. 846, § 2; 2017, ch. 2, § 2; 2017, ch. 37, § 2; 2017, ch. 45, § 2; 2017, ch. 50, § 2; 2017, ch. 53, § 2; 2017, ch. 56, § 2; 2017, ch. 58, § 2; 2017, ch. 60, § 2; 2017, ch. 61, § 2; 2017, ch. 62, § 2; 2017, ch. 63, § 2; 2017, ch. 64, § 2; 2017, ch. 318, § 2; 2017, ch. 327, § 2; 2018, ch. 506, § 2; 2018, ch. 512, § 2; 2018, ch. 524, § 2; 2018, ch. 594, § 2; 2018, ch. 711, § 2; 2018, ch. 803, § 1; 2018, ch. 928, § 2; 2018, ch. 987, § 2; 2018, ch. 988, § 2; 2018, ch. 1034, § 2; 2018, ch. 1035, § 2; 2018, ch. 1043, § 2; 2019, ch. 58, § 2; 2019, ch. 73, § 2; 2019, ch. 305, § 1; 2019, ch. 334, § 2; 2019, ch. 335, § 1; 2020, ch. 537, § 1; 2020, ch. 538, § 1; 2020, ch. 539, § 1; 2020, ch. 540, § 1; 2020, ch. 541, § 1; 2020, ch. 542, § 1; 2020, ch. 543, § 1; 2020, ch. 544, § 1; 2020, ch. 545, § 1; 2020, ch. 546, § 1; 2020, ch. 547, § 1; 2020, ch. 548, § 1; 2020, ch. 549, § 1; 2020, ch. 550, § 1; 2020, ch. 551, § 1; 2020, ch. 552, § 1; 2020, ch. 553, § 1; 2020, ch. 554, § 1; 2020, ch. 555, § 1; 2020, ch. 556, § 1; 2020, ch. 557, § 1; 2020, ch. 558, § 1; 2020, ch. 559, § 1; 2020, ch. 560, § 1; 2020, ch. 561, § 1; 2020, ch. 562, § 1; 2020, ch. 563, § 1; 2020, ch. 564, § 1; 2020, ch. 565, § 1; 2020, ch. 566, § 1; 2020, ch. 567, § 1; 2020, ch. 568, § 1; 2020, ch. 569, § 1; 2020, ch. 611, § 1; 2020, ch. 612, § 1; 2020, ch. 613, § 1; 2020, ch. 614, § 1; 2020, ch. 615, § 1; 2020, ch. 616, § 1; 2020, ch. 617, § 1; 2020, ch. 633, § 1; 2020, ch. 634, § 1; 2020, ch. 637, § 1; 2020, ch. 638, § 1; 2020, ch. 639, § 1; 2020, ch. 640, § 14; 2020, ch. 641, § 1; 2020, ch. 656, § 1; 2020, ch. 657, § 1; 2020, ch. 661, § 1; 2020, ch. 662, § 1; 2020, ch. 663, § 1; 2020, ch. 664, § 1; 2020, ch. 665, § 1; 2020, ch. 666, § 1; 2020, ch. 667, § 1; 2020, ch. 671, § 1; 2020, ch. 672, § 1; 2020, ch. 678, § 1; 2020, ch. 695, § 1; 2020, ch. 702, § 1; 2020, ch. 767, § 1; 2020, ch. 768, § 1; 2020, ch. 769, § 1.